Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1307
Arbitration board; membership.

An arbitration board shall be formed to arbitrate the wholesale electric rate dispute in conformity with the standards set out in section 70-1302. The arbitration board shall consist of three members, one of whom shall be selected by the purchaser, one of whom shall be selected by the supplier, and a third shall be selected by the other two arbitrators.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 7.